Utah statutes.
59-14-403.   Duplicate invoice requirements -- Failure to comply --
Penalties.
All persons dealing in taxable cigarettes or tobacco products, who purchase or
receive these commodities from outside the state, whether the product is
delivered through a wholesaler or distributor in this state, or by drop
shipment or otherwise, shall mail or deliver a duplicate invoice of all those
purchases or receipts to the commission within ten days after receipt of the
commodities if requested by the commission.  Failure to furnish duplicate
invoices or receipts as requested is subject to the penalties provided under
Section 59-1-401.
